test/src/morphology/V-juuodw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - jūodõ: # Verb 9 'eng /est juua/fin' - full paradigm
     jūodõ+V+Inf: jūodõ
     jūodõ+V+Ger: jūodsõ
     jūodõ+V+Sup: jūomõ
     jūodõ+V+Sup+Ine: jūomõõs
     jūodõ+V+Sup+Ela: jūomõõst
     jūodõ+V+Sup+Tra: jūomõõks
     jūodõ+V+Sup+Abe: jūomõõt
     jūodõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jūob
     jūodõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jūotõ
     jūodõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jūobõd
     jūodõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juoi
     jūodõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juoitõ
     jūodõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juoitõ
     jūodõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: jūo
     jūodõ+V+Cond+Sg3: jūoks
     jūodõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: jūo
     jūodõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: jūo
     jūodõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: jūogid
     jūodõ+V+Jus+Sg3: jūogõ
     jūodõ+V+QuoSg3: jūoji
     jūodõ+V+ActPrfPrc: jūond
     jūodõ+V+PssPrfPrc: jūodõd
